Massachusetts, session 194th, S1902.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 100 of chapter 32 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “death,” in line 15 the following
words:-
or if a public emergency medical technician while in the performance of his duties and as
the result of an assault on his person or as a result of an accident while responding to or returning
from any emergency or as the result of an accident involving an EMS department vehicle, which
the public emergency medical technician is operating or in which he is riding or while at the
scene of any emergency is killed or sustains injuries while on duty which results in his death,
of 4

SECTION 2. Section 100 of said chapter 32, as so appearing, is hereby further amended
by striking out, in lines 16-17, the words “firefighter, police officer or corrections officer” and
inserting in place thereof the following words:-
firefighter, police officer, corrections officer, or public emergency medical technician
SECTION 3. Section 100 of said chapter 32, as so appearing, is hereby further amended
by striking out, in lines 18-19, the words “firefighter, police officer or corrections officer” and
inserting in place thereof the following words:-
firefighter, police officer, corrections officer, or public emergency medical technician
SECTION 4. Section 100 of said chapter 32, as so appearing, is hereby further amended
by striking out, in lines 22-23, the words “firefighter, police officer or corrections officer” and
inserting in place thereof the following words:-
firefighter, police officer, corrections officer, or public emergency medical technician
SECTION 5. Section 100 of said chapter 32, as so appearing, is hereby further amended
by striking out, in line 26, the words “firefighter, police officer or corrections officer” and
inserting in place thereof the following words:-
firefighter, police officer, corrections officer, or public emergency medical technician
SECTION 6. Section 100 of said chapter 32, as so appearing, is hereby further amended
by striking out, in lines 45-46, the words “firefighter, police officer or corrections officer” and
inserting in place thereof the following words:-
firefighter, police officer, corrections officer, or public emergency medical technician
of 4

SECTION 7. Section 100 of said chapter 32, as so appearing, is hereby further amended
by striking out, in line 53, the words “firefighter, police officer or corrections officer” and
inserting in place thereof the following words:-
firefighter, police officer, corrections officer, or public emergency medical technician
SECTION 8. Section 100 of said chapter 32, as so appearing, is hereby further amended
by striking out, in line 67, the words “firefighter, police officer or corrections officer” and
inserting in place thereof the following words:-
firefighter, police officer, corrections officer, or public emergency medical technician
SECTION 9. Section 100 of said chapter 32, as so appearing, is hereby further amended
by striking out, in lines 75-76, the words “firefighter, police officer or corrections officer” and
inserting in place thereof the following words:-
firefighter, police officer, corrections officer, or public emergency medical technician
SECTION 10. Section 100 of said chapter 32, as so appearing, is hereby further amended
by striking out, in lines 79-80, the words “firefighter, police officer or corrections officer” and
inserting in place thereof the following words:-
firefighter, police officer, corrections officer, or public emergency medical technician
SECTION 11. Section 100 of said chapter 32, as so appearing, is hereby further amended
by striking out, in lines 88-89, the words “firefighter, police officer or corrections officer” and
inserting in place thereof the following words:-
firefighter, police officer, corrections officer, or public emergency medical technician
of 4

SECTION 12. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 4